Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7209
Reporting and disclosure requirements.

(1) A health carrier shall document and communicate information, as provided in this section, about its quality assessment program and its quality improvement program, if it has one, and shall include a description of its quality assessment and quality improvement programs and a statement of patient rights and responsibilities with respect to those programs in the certificate of coverage or handbook provided to newly enrolled covered persons.

(2)(a) A health carrier shall certify to the director annually that its quality assessment program and its quality improvement program, if it has one, along with the materials provided to providers and consumers in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, meet the requirements of the Quality Assessment and Improvement Act.

(b) A health carrier shall make available for review by the public upon request, subject to a reasonable fee, the materials certified pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section, except for the materials subject to the confidentiality requirements of section 44-7210 and materials that are proprietary to the health benefit plan. A health carrier shall retain all certified materials for at least three years from the date the material has been used or until the material has been examined as part of a market conduct examination, whichever is longer.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 59.